Massachusetts, session 194th, H1464.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Part I ADMINISTRATION OF THE GOVERNMENT
Title II EXECUTIVE AND ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICERS OF THE
COMMONWEALTH
Chapter 15A PUBLIC EDUCATION
Section 22A REGGIE LEWIS TRACK AND ATHLETIC CENTER;
ESTABLISHMENT; POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD
Section 22A.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following meanings:
of 3

;Board, the board of trustees of the Roxbury Community College.
;Center, the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center established in subsection (b).
&#39;&#39;College&#39;&#39;, the Roxbury Community College.
&#39;&#39;Use for nonpublic purposes&#39;&#39;, shall include, but not be limited to,
the leasing or renting of the building for commercial entertainment activity.
&#39;&#39;Use for public purposes&#39;&#39;, shall include, but not be limited to, use
by public high school track programs, members of the abutting residential community or by
members of the community at large and students, faculty, staff, and alumni at Roxbury
Community College.
(b) There shall be established the Reggie Lewis Track and Athletic Center at Roxbury
Community College. The center shall be a building containing a Massachusetts state track
facility which shall be maintained at the college for public purposes. In the event the facility is
not in use for public purposes, the board may permit use for nonpublic purposes for a rental
amount to be determined by said board.
(c) The board shall be responsible for the management and operation of the center
including, but not limited to, the following:
(i) establishing user fees;
(ii) entering into agreements with the Massachusetts State Track Coaches Association,
with other public groups and, pursuant to this section, with nonpublic groups for nonpublic
purposes;
of 3

(iii) establishing rules and regulations for the use of the center by Massachusetts public
high school track programs, by members of the abutting residential neighborhoods and members
of the community at large, by students, faculty and staff and alumni of Roxbury Community
College, and, by nonpublic groups for nonpublic purposes in accordance with this section;
(iv) deciding the priority of uses and schedule for the center, with input from an advisory
committee; and
11
(v) entering into agreements with vendors to provide concession stand services and other
agreements as deemed necessary by the board for the maintenance and operation of the center.
(d) The center shall be made available without charge for use by public high school track
programs and Roxbury Community College. The center shall be made available on a user fee
basis for members of the public. The center shall be made available at market rate, as determined
by the board, for use for nonpublic purposes so long as the center is not being used for public
purposes.
(e) The annual operating expenses of the center shall be separate and distinct from
appropriations within the general appropriations act for the college, shall use a separate item of
appropriation, and shall be audited biennially by the state audit
of 3